Hawaii statutes.
§488-5 Annual exhibits; examination by commissioner.
(a) Each plan shall file with the commissioner within sixty days after the end
of its fiscal year an income statement and balance sheet compiled, reviewed, or
audited by a certified public accountant.

(b) The powers, authorities, and duties
relating to examinations vested in and imposed upon the commissioner under
chapter 431 apply with respect to examinations of plans subject to this
section; provided that no examination shall attempt to obtain or inspect
written or oral information or documents in violation of the rules for client-lawyer
confidentiality as contained in the Hawaii rules of professional conduct
adopted by the supreme court. [L 1976, c 156, pt of §1; am L 1982, c 204, §8;
am L 1983, c 124, §17; am L 2008, c 19, §75; am L 2010, c 47, §1(5)]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next